src-fst-morphology-affixes-propernouns.lexc.md
# Lule Sáme Proper noun morphology !

## Even syllable proper nouns

Unstressed last syllable

Words in ACCRA lexicons end on vowel, have no CG and get "even-syllable" case marking where case suffixes are added directly. Illative e:i, but not o:u. Last syllable is unstressed. Both non-assimilated and assmilated stems (although not all are fully, or correctly, assmilated)

LEXICON ACCRA-ani   Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Illative e changes to i. Animales.

* Tjuorri # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Tjuorri:* `Tjuorri+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Nom`
* *Tjuorrij:* `Tjuorri+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ill`
* *Tjuorris:* `Tjuorri+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON ACCRA-obj  Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Object names

* Gestapo # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Gestapo:* `Gestapo+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom`
* *Gestapoj:* `Gestapo+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill`
* *Gestapos:* `Gestapo+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON ACCRA-org  Vowel-final names where caseendings are added directly, no cg. organizations

* Giellatekno # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Giellatekno:* `Giellatekno+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom`
* *Giellateknoj:* `Giellatekno+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill`
* *Giellateknos:* `Giellatekno+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON ACCRA-mal  Vowel-final names where case are added directly, no cg. Male names

* Antonio # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Antonio:* `Antonio+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom`
* *Antonioj:* `Antonio+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill`
* *Antonios:* `Antonio+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON ACCRA-fem  Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Female names

* Barbro # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Barbro:* `Barbro+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom`
* *Barbroj:* `Barbro+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill`
* *Barbros:* `Barbro+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON ACCRA-femsur  Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Female names also used as surnames

* Sara # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Sara:* `Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom`
* *Saraj:* `Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill`
* *Saraj:* `Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill`
* *Saras:* `Sara+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON ACCRA-malfem  Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Names that can be both female and male names

* Janne # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Janne:* `Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom`
* *Janne:* `Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom`
* *Jannij:* `Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill`
* *Jannes:* `Janne+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON ACCRA-objplc  Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Names that can be both objects and place names

* Soria-Moria # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Soria-Moria:* `Soria-Moria+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom`
* *Soria-Moriaj:* `Soria-Moria+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill`
* *Soria-Morias:* `Soria-Moria+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela`
* *Soria-Moriaj:* `Soria-Moria+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill`
* *soria-moriak:* `Soria-Moria+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom`
* *soria-morialasj:* `Soria-Moria+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON ACCRA-femplc  Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Names that can be both female and place names

* Salla # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Salla:* `Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom`
* *Salla:* `Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom`
* *Sallaj:* `Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill`
* *Sallas:* `Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela`
* *sallak:* `Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom`
* *sallalasj:* `Salla+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON ACCRA-sur  Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Surnames

* Tønne # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Tønne:* `Tønne+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom`
* *Tønnij:* `Tønne+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill`
* *Tønnes:* `Tønne+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON ACCRA-malsur   Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Names that can be both male- and surnames

* Valio # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Valio:* `Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom`
* *Valio:* `Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom`
* *Valioj:* `Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill`
* *Valios:* `Valio+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON ACCRA-plc  Vowel-final names where caseendings are added directly, no cg. Place names

* Burma # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Burma:* `Burma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* *Burmaj:* `Burma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill`
* *Burmas:* `Burma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela`
* *burmak:* `Burma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom`
* *burmalasj:* `Burma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON ACCRA_MWE-plc  Vowel-final names where caseendings are added directly, no cg. Place names

LEXICON GIRUNA-plc  For proper Kiruna. Same as ACCRA. Different lexicon because of sma.

* Veitsiluoto # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Veitsiluoto:* `Veitsiluoto+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* *Veitsiluoto:* `Veitsiluoto+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* *Veitsiluotoj:* `Veitsiluoto+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill`
* *Veitsiluotos:* `Veitsiluoto+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela`
* *veitsiluotok:* `Veitsiluoto+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom`
* *veitsiluotolasj:* `Veitsiluoto+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON ACCRA-LOAN-org  Only nominatives. Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. organizations

* Samenes Idrettsforbund-Norge # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Samenes* `Idrettsforbund-Norge:` (Eng. Samenes Idrettsforbund-Norge+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom)
* ★*Samenes* `Idrettsforbund-Norge:` (is not standard language Samenes Idrettsforbund-Norge+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela # negative test)

LEXICON ACCRA-LOAN-obj  Only nominatives. Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Object names

* The Norwegian Sami Experience # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *The* `Norwegian` (Eng. Sami Experience: The Norwegian Sami Experience+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom)
* ★*The* `Norwegian` (is not standard language Sami Experience: The Norwegian Sami Experience+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill # Negative test)

LEXICON ACCRA-LOAN-plc  Only nominatives. Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg.Place names

* Kautokeino # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Kautokeino:* `Kautokeino+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* ★*Kautokeinos:* `Kautokeino+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela` (is not standard language # negative test)

In smj RONDANE is same as ACCRA, in use in smi because of diffrences in sme. No -lasj or -k. Last syllable is unstressed. Non-assimilated-stems.

LEXICON RONDANE-plc  E-final names, with no cg. elative -s, ill -ij. Place names

* Bakkane # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Bakkane:* `Bakkane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* *Bakkane:* `Bakkane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen`
* *Bakkanev:* `Bakkane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc`
* *Bakkanen:* `Bakkane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine`
* *Bakkanij:* `Bakkane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill`
* *Bakkanes:* `Bakkane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela`
* *Bakkanijn:* `Bakkane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com`
* *Bakkanijda:* `Bakkane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill`
* *Bakkanijs:* `Bakkane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ela`
* ★*bakkanek:* `Bakkane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)
* ★*bakkanelasj:* `Bakkane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)

LEXICON RONDANE-SG-plc  E-final names, with no cg. elative -s, ill -ij. Place names

* Bakkane # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Bakkane:* `Bakkane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* *Bakkane:* `Bakkane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen`
* *Bakkanev:* `Bakkane+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc`

LEXICON RONDANE-LOAN  Only nominative.Place names

* Azorene # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Azorene:* `Azorene+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* ★*Azorenij:* `Azorene+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill` (is not standard language # Negative test)

LEXICON RONDANE-SG-LOAN  Only nominative. Place names

LEXICON RONDANE-sur  Surnames

* Benneche # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Benneche:* `Benneche+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom`
* *Bennechij:* `Benneche+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill`
* *Benneches:* `Benneche+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON RONDANE-obj  Objects

* Office # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Office:* `Office+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom`
* *Office:* `Office+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen`
* *Officev:* `Office+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Acc`
* *Officen:* `Office+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ine`
* *Officij:* `Office+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill`
* *Offices:* `Office+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela`
* *Officijn:* `Office+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Com`

LEXICON RONDANE-org  Organizations

* Picture # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Picture:* `Picture+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom`
* *Picturij:* `Picture+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill`
* *Pictures:* `Picture+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON RONDANE-mal  Male names

* Lawrence # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Lawrence:* `Lawrence+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom`
* *Lawrencij:* `Lawrence+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill`
* *Lawrences:* `Lawrence+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON RONDANE-fem  Female names

* Jannike # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Jannike:* `Jannike+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom`
* *Jannikij:* `Jannike+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill`
* *Jannikes:* `Jannike+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela`

These sublexica are irrelevant for ACCRA, but added
for the sake of the lexicon MARJA

GATA are Norwegian place names that end on -gata. Gets even-syllable casemarking. Last syllable is unstressed. Non-assimilated stems.

LEXICON GATA-plc   Norwegian place names that end on -gata. Gets even-syllable casemarking. Last syllable is unstressed.

* Munkegata # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Munkegata:* `Munkegata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* *Munkegataj:* `Munkegata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill`
* *Munkegatas:* `Munkegata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela`

Words in MARJA end on vowel, with CG, even-syllable case marking. Illative change e to á, illative i stays i. Last syllable is unstressed. Real lule sami stems.

LEXICON MARJA-fem  Odd-syllable with cg. Female names

* Gáddjá # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Gáddjá:* `Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom`
* *Gáddjáj:* `Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill`
* *Gádjás:* `Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON MARJA-ani  Animal names

* Vilge # Even-syllable test  examples:*
* *Gávrásski:* `Gávrásski+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Nom`
* *Gávrásskij:* `Gávrásski+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ill`
* *Gávráskis:* `Gávrásski+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON MARJA-mal  Male names

* Biet-Ánnda # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Biet-Ánnda:* `Biet-Ánnda+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom`
* *Biet-Ánndaj:* `Biet-Ánnda+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill`
* *Biet-Ándas:* `Biet-Ánnda+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON MARJA-obj  Objects

* Bern-Konvensjåvnnå # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Bern-Konvensjåvnnå:* `Bern-Konvensjåvnnå+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom`
* *Bern-Konvensjåvnnåj:* `Bern-Konvensjåvnnå+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill`
* *Bern-Konvensjåvnås:* `Bern-Konvensjåvnnå+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON MARJA-org  Organizations

* Domænadoajmma # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Domænadoajmma:* `Domænadoajmma+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom`
* *Domænadoajmmaj:* `Domænadoajmma+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill`
* *Domænadåjmas:* `Domænadoajmma+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON MARJA-plc  Vowel final names with Gradation and Ill change (place names)

* Dundarevuobme # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Dundarevuobme:* `Dundarevuobme+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* *Dundarevuobmáj:* `Dundarevuobme+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill`
* *Dundarevuomes:* `Dundarevuobme+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON MARJA-sur  Surnames

* Skálltje # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Skálltje:* `Skálltje+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom`
* *Skálltjáj:* `Skálltje+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill`
* *Skáltjes:* `Skálltje+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON MARJA-plc-der  = place name derivations and corresponding flag. Presently not used in SMJ.

LEXICON SUOBMA-plc  Placenames. Like MARJA but no derivation

* Suobma # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *Suobma:* `Suobma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* *Suobmaj:* `Suobma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill`
* *Suomas:* `Suobma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON SUOBMA-org  Placenames. Like MARJA but no derivation

Stressed last syllable
